Washington statutes.
RCW 36.88.295

Refunding bonds—Limitations.

The legislative authority of any county may issue and sell bonds to refund outstanding road improvement district or consolidated road improvement district bonds issued after June 7, 1984, on the earliest date such outstanding bonds may be redeemed following the date of issuance of such refunding bonds. Such refunding shall be subject to the following:

(1) The refunding shall result in a net interest cost savings after paying the costs and expenses of the refunding, and the principal amount of the refunding bonds may not exceed the principal balance of the assessment roll or rolls pledged to pay the bonds being refunded at the time of the refunding.

(2) The refunding bonds shall be paid from the same local improvement fund or bond redemption fund as the bonds being refunded.

(3) The costs and expenses of the refunding shall be paid from the proceeds of the refunding bonds, or the same road improvement district fund or bond redemption fund for the bonds being refunded, except the county may advance such costs and expenses to such fund pending the receipt of assessment payments available to reimburse such advances.

(4) The last maturity of refunding bonds shall be no later than one year after the last maturity of bonds being refunded.

(5) The refunding bonds may be exchanged for the bonds being refunded or may be sold in the same manner permitted at the time of sale for road improvement district bonds.

(6) All other provisions of law applicable to the refunded bonds shall apply to the refunding bonds.

[ 1984 c 186 s 67.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.